Virginia statutes. Title 45.2. Mines, Minerals, and Energy.
Article 2. Regulation of Mining Activity.
§ 45.2-1021.
Civil and criminal penalties.

Any permittee who violates any permit condition or any other provision of this chapter or the regulations adopted hereunder may be assessed a civil penalty by the Director, except that if such violation leads to the issuance of a cessation order, the civil penalty shall be assessed. Such penalty shall not exceed $5,000 for each violation except that if the violation resulted in a personal injury or fatality to any person, then the civil penalty shall not exceed $70,000 for each violation. Each day of continuing violation may be deemed a separate violation for the purposes of assessing penalties. In determining the amount of the penalty, consideration shall be given to the permittee’s history of previous violations at the particular coal surface mining operation; the seriousness of the violation, including any irreparable harm to the environment and any hazard to the health or safety of the public; whether the permittee was negligent; and the demonstrated good faith of the permittee charged in attempting to achieve rapid compliance after notification of the violation.

A civil penalty may be assessed by the Director only after the person charged with a violation has been given an opportunity for a public hearing. After such public hearing has been held, the Director shall make findings of fact and issue a written decision as to the occurrence of the violation and the amount of the penalty that is warranted, incorporating therein, when appropriate, an order requiring that the penalty be paid. When appropriate, the Director shall consolidate such hearing with other proceedings pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. Any hearing under this section shall be a formal adjudicatory hearing in accordance with the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.). If the person charged with such violation fails to avail himself of the opportunity for a public hearing, a civil penalty shall be assessed by the Director after the Director determines that a violation has occurred and the amount of the penalty warranted and issues an order requiring that the penalty be paid.

Upon the issuance of a notice or order charging that a violation described under subsection A has occurred, the Director shall inform the permittee within 30 days of the proposed amount of the penalty. Such permittee shall, within 30 days of being so informed, pay the proposed penalty in full or, if the permittee contests either the amount of the penalty or the fact of the violation, forward the proposed amount to the Director for placement in an interest-bearing trust account in the state treasury. Failure to forward the money to the Director within 30 days constitutes a waiver of all legal rights to contest the violation or the amount of the penalty. If through administrative or judicial review of the proposed penalty it is determined that no violation occurred or that the amount of the penalty will be reduced, the Director shall within 30 days of such determination remit the appropriate amount to the permittee with accrued interest thereon.

If a permittee required to pay a civil penalty fails to do so, the Director may transmit a true copy of the final order assessing such penalty to the clerk of the court of any county or city wherein it is ascertained that the permittee owing the penalty has any estate; and the clerk to whom such copy is sent shall record such final order, as a judgment is required by law to be recorded, and index it in the name of the Commonwealth and the name of the person owing the penalty. Upon such recording and indexing, there shall be a lien in favor of the Commonwealth on the property of the permittee within such county or city in the amount of the penalty. The Director may collect civil penalties that are owed in the same manner as provided by law in respect to judgment of a court of record. All civil penalties shall be paid into a special fund in the state treasury to be used by the Director for enhancing conservation and recreational opportunities in the coal-producing counties of the Commonwealth. The Director shall transfer quarterly 50 percent of the fund balance to the Virginia Coalfield Economic Development Authority, created pursuant to Chapter 60 (§

15.2-6000

et seq.) of Title 15.2, for the purposes of developing infrastructure and improvements at Breaks Interstate Park and 50 percent of the fund balance to the Heart of Appalachia Tourism Authority for the purpose of developing conservation and recreational opportunities consistent with the provisions of Chapter 55 (§

15.2-5500

et seq.) of Title 15.2.

Any person who willfully and knowingly (i) conducts any coal surface mining or coal exploration operation without first obtaining a permit, or after a permit has lapsed, or after suspension or revocation of a permit; (ii) violates a condition of a permit issued pursuant to this chapter; or (iii) disregards or fails or refuses to comply with any regulation adopted or order issued pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, except an order incorporated in a decision under subsection B, shall upon conviction be punished by a fine of not more than $10,000, by confinement in jail for not more than 12 months, or both.

Whenever a corporate permittee violates a condition of a permit or disregards or fails or refuses to comply with any order issued under this chapter, except an order incorporated in a decision issued under subsection B, any director, officer, or agent of such corporation who willfully and knowingly authorized, ordered, or carried out such violation, failure, or refusal is subject to the same civil penalties, fines, and confinement in jail to which a person may be subject under subsections A and E.

Whoever knowingly makes any false statement, representation, or certification, or knowingly fails to make any required statement, representation, or certification, in any application, objection, record, report, plan, or other document filed or required to be maintained pursuant to this chapter, any regulation adopted hereunder, or any order or decision issued by the Director under this chapter shall upon conviction be punished by a fine of not more than $10,000, by confinement in jail for not more than 12 months, or both.

Any operator who within the period permitted for the correction of such violation fails to correct a violation for which a notice or order has been issued shall be assessed a civil penalty of not less than $750 for each day during which such failure or violation occurs. Such period for the correction of a violation shall not end until the entry of (i) a final order by the Director, in the case of any review proceedings initiated by the operator wherein the Director orders, after an expedited hearing, the suspension of the abatement requirements of the notice or order after determining that the operator is likely to suffer irreparable loss or damage from the application of such requirements or (ii) an order of the court, in the case of any review proceedings initiated by the operator wherein the court orders the suspension of the abatement requirements.

History.

1979, c. 290, § 45.1-246; 1980, c. 510; 1993, c. 663; 2005, c. 3; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 384, 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 3, cl. 4 provides: “That an emergency exists and this act is in force from its passage [February 10, 2005].”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 384, effective July 1, 2021, amended § 45.1-246 from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, the amendment by c. 384 has been given effect in this section by substituting “Heart of Appalachia Tourism Authority” for “Tourism Development Authority” in subsection D.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-1022.
Citizen suits; rights of citizens to accompany inspectors.

Except as provided in subsection B or C, any person having an interest that is or could be adversely affected may, in order to compel compliance with the provisions of this chapter, commence a civil action on his own behalf against:

The United States, any other governmental instrumentality or agency, or any person alleged to be in violation of any provision of this chapter or of any regulation, order, or permit issued pursuant thereto; or

The Director, when there is alleged a failure of the Director to perform any act or duty under this chapter that is not a discretionary act on the part of the Director.

No action shall be commenced under subdivision A 1:

Prior to 60 days after the plaintiff has given written notice of the violation to the Secretary, the Director, and any alleged violator; or

If the Commonwealth or the Secretary has commenced and is diligently prosecuting a civil or criminal action in a court of the United States or the Commonwealth to require compliance with the provisions of this chapter, or any regulation, order, or permit issued pursuant to this chapter, so long as in any such action in a court of the Commonwealth, any person is entitled to intervene as a matter of right.

No action shall be commenced under subdivision A 2 prior to 60 days after the plaintiff has given written notice of such action to the Director in a manner prescribed by regulation. However, such action may be brought immediately after such notification in any case in which it is alleged that a violation or order would constitute an imminent threat to the health or safety of the plaintiff or would immediately affect a legal interest of the plaintiff.

Any action with respect to a violation of this chapter or a regulation adopted hereunder may be brought only in the circuit court of the county or city in which the surface coal mining operation complained of is located. In any such action commenced under the provisions of this section, the Director may intervene as a matter of right, whether or not the Director is a party to the action.

The court, in issuing any final order in any action brought pursuant to subsection A, may award costs of litigation, including attorney and expert witness fees, to any party if the court determines such award is appropriate. If a preliminary injunction is sought, the court may require the filing of a bond or equivalent security in accordance with the rules of civil procedure.

Nothing in this section shall restrict any common-law or statutory right of any person or class of persons to seek enforcement of any provision of this chapter or the regulations adopted hereunder or to seek any other relief, including relief against the Director.

Any person who as a result of the violation by any operator of any regulation, order, or permit issued pursuant to this chapter suffers injury to his person or property may bring an action for damages, including reasonable attorney and expert witness fees. Such action shall be brought only in the circuit court of the county or city in which the surface coal mining operation complained of is located. Nothing in this subsection shall affect the rights established by or limits imposed under the Virginia Workers’ Compensation Act (§

65.2-100

et seq.).

Whenever information provided to the Director by any person results in any inspection, the Director shall notify such person of the time at which the inspection is scheduled to occur, and such person shall be allowed to accompany the inspector during the inspection.

History.

1980, c. 510, § 45.1-246.1; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1023.
Forfeiture or release of performance bond.

The Director shall adopt regulations, consistent with regulations adopted by the Secretary, establishing procedures, conditions, criteria, and schedules for the forfeiture or release of performance bonds or deposits required under this chapter; however, no bond shall be fully released until all reclamation requirements of this chapter and the regulations adopted hereunder are fully met.

Any person with a valid legal interest that could be adversely affected by release of the bond, or the responsible officer or head of any federal, state, or local governmental agency that (i) has jurisdiction by law or special expertise with respect to any environmental, social, or economic impact involved in the operation or (ii) is authorized to develop and enforce environmental standards with respect to such operations, has the right to file written objections to the proposed release from bond by the Director within 30 days after the last publication of notice, as required by regulation. If a written objection is filed and a hearing requested, the Director shall inform all interested parties of the time and place of the hearing and hold a public hearing, either in the locality of the coal surface mining operation proposed for bond release or in Richmond, at the option of the objector, within 30 days of the request for such hearing.

Without prejudice to the rights of any objector or the applicant or the responsibilities of the Director pursuant to this section, the Director may establish an informal conference, in accordance with regulations adopted pursuant to §

45.2-1014

, to resolve written objections.

For the purpose of the hearing specified in subsection B, the Director may administer oaths, subpoena witnesses or written or printed materials, compel the attendance of witnesses or production of materials, and take evidence, including inspections of the land affected or other coal surface mining operations carried on by the applicant in the general vicinity. A verbatim record of each public hearing shall be made, and a transcript shall be made available on the motion of any party or by order of the Director.

History.

1979, c. 290, § 45.1-247; 1984, c. 590; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-1024.
Performance of reclamation operations by Director.

In the event of forfeiture of a performance bond, in whole or in part, the Director shall deposit the proceeds in the state treasury in a special fund to be used by the Director to complete the reclamation plan and other regulatory requirements pertaining to the operation for which the forfeited bond had been posted. The Director may use the resources and facilities of the Division or enter into contracts for performance of such reclamation with any person, any soil conservation district, or any agency of the state or federal government. After completion of the reclamation and payment of all costs and administrative expenses associated with the completion of reclamation, any additional funds from the forfeiture of the bond shall be returned.

History.

1979, c. 290, § 45.1-248; 1984, c. 590; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1025.
Administrative review of notice or order issued under § 45.2-1020.

A permittee who is issued a notice or order pursuant to §

45.2-1020

, or any person having an interest that is or could be adversely affected by such notice or order or by any modification, vacation, or termination of such notice or order, may apply to the Director for the review of such notice or order within 30 days of the receipt thereof or within 30 days of its modification, vacation, or termination. Upon receipt of such application, the Director shall cause such investigation to be made as he deems appropriate. Such investigation shall, at the request of the applicant or the person having an interest that is or could be adversely affected, include a public formal hearing to enable the applicant or such person to present information relating to the issuance and continuance of such notice or order or the modification, vacation, or termination thereof. The filing of an application for review under this subsection shall not operate as a stay of any order or notice.

Upon receiving the report of such investigation, the Director shall make findings of fact and shall issue a written decision, incorporating therein an order vacating, affirming, modifying, or terminating the notice or order complained of. Such order shall incorporate the Director’s findings of fact. If the application for review concerns an order for cessation of coal surface mining and reclamation operations issued pursuant to the provisions of subsection A or C of §

45.2-1020

, the Director shall issue the written decision within 30 days of the receipt of the application for review unless temporary relief has been granted by the Director pursuant to subsection C or by a court pursuant to §

45.2-1027

.

Pending completion of the hearing required by this section, the applicant may file with the Director a written request that the Director grant temporary relief from any notice or order issued under §

45.2-1020

, together with a detailed statement giving reasons for granting such relief. The Director shall issue an order granting or denying such relief expeditiously. If the applicant requests relief from an order for cessation of coal surface mining and reclamation operations issued pursuant to subsection A or C of §

45.2-1020

, the order on such a request shall be issued within five days of its receipt. The Director may grant such relief, under such conditions as the Director prescribes, if:

A hearing has been held in the locality of the permit area on the request for temporary relief in which all parties were given an opportunity to be heard;

The applicant shows that there is substantial likelihood that the decision of the Director will be favorable to the applicant; and

Such relief will not adversely affect the health or safety of the public or cause significant imminent environmental harm to land, air, or water resources.

Following the issuance of an order to show cause as to why a permit should not be suspended or revoked pursuant to §

45.2-1020

, the Director shall hold a public formal hearing, unless waived by the permittee, after giving written notice of the time, place, and date thereof. Within 60 days following the formal hearing, the Director shall issue and furnish to the permittee and every other party to the hearing a written decision concerning suspension or revocation of the permit and reasons therefor. If the Director revokes the permit, the permittee shall immediately cease coal surface mining operations on the permit area and shall complete reclamation within a period specified by the Director, or the Director shall declare as forfeited the performance bonds for the operation.

The Director may adopt regulations providing for the award of costs and expenses, including attorney fees, to any party to any administrative proceedings under this chapter, incurred by such person in connection with his participation in such proceedings, and may assess such costs and expenses against any other party as the Director deems proper. For the purpose of this subsection, “party” includes the Commonwealth or any of its agents, officers, or employees.

History.

1979, c. 290, § 45.1-249; 1983, c. 93; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1026.
Hearings.

Every formal hearing shall be conducted in accordance with §

2.2-4020

unless the parties consent to informal proceedings. When a hearings officer presides, such officer shall recommend findings and a decision to the Director, who shall then issue findings and a decision, unless the Director provides for the making of findings and an initial decision by such hearings officer subject to review and reconsideration by the Director on appeal as of right or on the Director’s own motion. Such regulations shall also provide for a reasonable time in which such appeals shall be acted upon, which shall be in addition to the period required for the making of the initial decision.

History.

1979, c. 290, § 45.1-250; 1984, c. 590; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1027.
Judicial review of final order or decision or decision under § 45.2-1035.

Any party aggrieved by a final order, decision, or decision for entry upon property pursuant to §

45.2-1035

, issued by the Director, after exhaustion of the administrative remedies provided for in this chapter, has the right to the judicial review thereof in the circuit court of the county or city in which the land at issue or a major portion thereof is located. In all other respects, judicial review shall be in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).

The commencement of a proceeding under this section shall not, unless specifically ordered by the court, operate as a stay of the order or decision of the Director. The court may, under such conditions as it prescribes, grant such temporary relief as it deems appropriate pending final determination of the proceedings if:

All parties to the proceedings have been notified and given an opportunity to be heard on a request for temporary relief;

The person requesting such relief shows that there is a substantial likelihood that he will prevail on the merits of the final determination of the proceeding; and

Such relief will not adversely affect the public health or safety or cause significant imminent environmental harm to land, air, or water resources.

The court may award costs and expenses, including attorney fees, to any party to any proceeding under this section and may assess such costs and expenses against any other party as the court deems proper. For the purpose of this subsection, “party” includes the Commonwealth or any of its agents, officers, or employees.

History.

1979, c. 290, § 45.1-251; 1983, c. 93; 1984, c. 590; 1986, c. 615; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-1028.
Designating areas unsuitable for coal surface mining.

The Director shall establish a planning process that enables objective decisions, based on competent and scientifically sound data and information, regarding which land areas of the Commonwealth, if any, are unsuitable for coal surface mining operations pursuant to the standards set forth in subdivisions 2 and 3. Such designation shall not prevent the mineral exploration pursuant to this chapter of any area so designated.
A. 1. The Director shall establish a planning process that enables objective decisions, based on competent and scientifically sound data and information, regarding which land areas of the Commonwealth, if any, are unsuitable for coal surface mining operations pursuant to the standards set forth in subdivisions 2 and 3. Such designation shall not prevent the mineral exploration pursuant to this chapter of any area so designated.

Upon petition pursuant to subsection C, the Director shall designate a land area as unsuitable for all or certain types of coal surface mining operations if the Director determines that reclamation pursuant to the requirements of this chapter is not technologically and economically feasible.

Upon petition pursuant to subsection C, the Director may designate a surface area as unsuitable for certain types of coal surface mining operations if such operations will (i) be incompatible with existing land use plans or programs; (ii) affect fragile or historic lands in which such operations could result in significant damage to important historic, cultural, scientific, or aesthetic values or natural systems; (iii) affect renewable resource lands, including aquifers and aquifer recharge areas, in which such operations could result in a substantial loss or reduction of long-range productivity of water supply or food or fiber products; or (iv) affect natural hazard lands, including areas subject to frequent flooding and areas of unstable geology, in which such operations could substantially endanger life and property.

Any determination of the unsuitability of a land area for coal surface mining made pursuant to this section shall be integrated as closely as possible with present and future land use planning and regulation processes at the federal, state, and local levels.

The requirements of this section shall not apply to any land area (i) on which a coal surface mining operation was being conducted on August 3, 1977; (ii) on which a coal surface mining operation was being conducted under a permit issued pursuant to the provisions of the federal act; or (iii) where substantial legal and financial commitments in either such operation were in existence prior to January 4, 1977.

Prior to designating any land area as unsuitable for a coal surface mining operation, the Director shall cause to be prepared a detailed statement on (i) the potential coal resources of the area, (ii) the demand for coal resources, and (iii) the impact of such designation on the environment, the economy, and the supply of coal.

Any person having an interest that is or could be adversely affected has the right to petition the Director to have an area designated as unsuitable for coal surface mining operations, or to have such a designation terminated. Such petition shall contain allegations of facts with supporting evidence that would tend to establish the allegations. Within 10 months after receipt of the petition, the Department shall hold a public hearing in the locality in which the affected area is located, after appropriate notice and publication of the date, time, and location of the hearing. After a person having an interest that is or could be adversely affected has filed a petition but before the hearing required by this subsection has taken place, any person may intervene by filing allegations of facts with supporting evidence that would tend to establish the allegations. The Director shall issue and furnish to the petitioner and any other party to the hearing, within 60 days after such hearing, a written decision regarding the petition and the reasons therefor. In the event that all petitioners stipulate agreement prior to the hearing and withdraw their requests, such hearing need not be held.

Subject to valid existing rights, no coal surface mining operation, except an operation that existed on August 3, 1977, shall be permitted:

On any lands within the boundaries of any unit of the National Park System, the National Wildlife Refuge System, the National Trails System, the National Wilderness Preservation System, or the Wild and Scenic Rivers System, including study rivers designated under § 5(a) of the Wild and Scenic Rivers Act; any National Recreation Area designated by act of Congress; or any federal lands within the boundaries of any national forest, except as otherwise provided by federal law;

That will adversely affect any publicly owned park or any site listed in the National Register of Historic Places unless approved jointly by the Director and the federal, state, or local agency with jurisdiction over the park or historic site;

Within 100 feet of the outside right-of-way line of any public road, except where a mine access road or haulage road joins such right-of-way line. However, the Director may permit such mine access or haulage road to be relocated or the area affected to lie within 100 feet of such public road if, after public notice and opportunity for hearing in the locality, a written finding is made that the interests of the public and landowners affected thereby will be protected; or

Within 300 feet of any occupied dwelling, unless waived by the owner thereof; within 300 feet of any public building, school, church, community or institutional building, or public park; or within 100 feet of a cemetery.

History.

1979, c. 290, § 45.1-252; 1984, c. 590; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.